New Jersey, session 221, A5178.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  A blind or physically disabled voter shall be permitted to move to the front of any line of voters awaiting their opportunity or time to enter the polling place or election booth that may be present at any polling location in this State and shall be given priority to cast their ballot or otherwise be provided with the ability to cast their ballot in an expedient manner. b.  The Secretary of State shall promulgate, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Not all physically disabled voters want to vote by mail, and many prefer to cast their vote in a community setting.  However, the need to stand and wait in long lines can make doing so difficult. This bill permits blind or physically disabled voters to move to the front of any line that may be present at any polling location in this State and be granted priority to cast their ballot or otherwise be permitted the ability to cast their ballot in an expedient manner. The bill directs the Secretary of State to promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act.